Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 27. Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 32(a), ch. 53, SLA 2008, “[e]xcept as provided in (b) of this section, [this chapter] applies to guardianship and protection proceedings that begin on or after September 2, 2008.”
Under § 32(b), ch. 53, SLA 2008, “[f]or guardianship and protection proceedings begun before September 2, 2008, regardless of whether a guardianship or protection offer has been issued, AS

13.27.010

—

13.27.040

,

13.27.200

,

13.27.210

,

13.27.300

—

13.27.320

,

13.27.400

,

13.27.410

, and

13.27.490

apply.”